apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_noms.en.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="ISO-8859-1"?>

<dictionary>
<alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
<sdefs>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
	<sdef n="unc"/>
  </sdefs><pardefs>



<pardef n="guionet">
    
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="coma">
    
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
    
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="separ">
    
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="drachma__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which add -e (normally applied to words of Latin origin), -i(LR), or -s (LR)">
      <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
   <e>
      <p>
         <l>e</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>s</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>i</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
 </pardef>

 
<pardef n="house__n__unc">
    <e>
       <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
    <e>
       <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="house__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which add -s">
      <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
   <e>
      <p>
         <l>s</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
 </pardef>
 
<pardef n="access__n__unc">
    <e>
       <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
    <e>
       <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="access__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which add -es">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>es</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="east__n">
   <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>


 <pardef n="bab/y__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which remove -y and add -ies or directly add -s (LR)">
     <p>
       <l>y</l>
       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>ies</l>
       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR" c="MG: és normatiu?">
     <p>
       <l>ys</l>
       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>


 <pardef n="analys/is__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which remove -is and add -es">
     <p>
       <l>is</l>
       <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>es</l>
       <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="maxim/um__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which remove -um and add -a or directly add -s (LR)">
     <p>
       <l>um</l>
       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>a</l>
       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>ums</l>
       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

 
<pardef n="mon/ey__n__unc">
    <e>
       <p>
          <l>ey</l>
          <r>eyey<s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
    <e>
       <p>
          <l>eys</l>
          <r>eyey<s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
    <e>
       <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>eyey<s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
    </e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mon/ey__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which add -s or remove -y and add -ies (LR)">
     <p>
       <l>ey</l>
       <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>eys</l>
       <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>ies</l>
       <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

<pardef n="m/an__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which remove -man and add -men">
     <p>
       <l>an</l>
       <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>en</l>
       <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>


 <pardef n="bass__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which end in -ss and add -es or nothing (LR)">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>es</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="bus__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which end in -s and add -es or -ses (LR)">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>es</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>ses</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="politics__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns that remain the same in plural">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="wol/f__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns that remove -f and add -ves or -s(EEUU; LR)">
     <p>
       <l>f</l>
       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>ves</l>
       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>fs</l>
       <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="li/fe__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns that remove -fe and add -ves">
     <p>
       <l>fe</l>
       <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>ves</l>
       <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

<e lm="time"><i>time</i><par n="house__n__unc"/></e>
<e lm="money"><i>mon</i><par n="mon/ey__n__unc"/></e>
<e lm="business"><i>business</i><par n="access__n__unc"/></e>
<e lm="help"><i>help</i><par n="house__n__unc"/></e>
<e lm="life"><i>li</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
<e lm="water"><i>water</i><par n="house__n__unc"/></e>
<e lm="half"><i>hal</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="wife"><i>wi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
<e lm="bus"><i>bus</i><par n="bus__n"/></e>
<e lm="spokeswoman"><i>spokeswom</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="fish"><i>fish</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
<e lm="box"><i>box</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
<e lm="minimum"><i>minim</i><par n="maxim/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="branch"><i>branch</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
<e lm="maximum"><i>maxim</i><par n="maxim/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="intersection"><i>intersection</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
<e lm="knife"><i>kni</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
<e lm="bass"><i>bass</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
<e lm="sweat"><i>sweat</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="post office box"><i>post<b/>office<b/>box</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
<e lm="sandwich"><i>sandwich</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
<e lm="availability"><i>availabilit</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="shelf"><i>shel</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="leaf"><i>lea</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="doctorate"><i>doctorate</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
<e lm="gymnastics"><i>gymnastics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="competitiveness"><i>competitiveness</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="thief"><i>thie</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="businesswoman"><i>businesswom</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="vanity"><i>vanit</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="patriarch"><i>patriarch</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
<e lm="condor"><i>condor</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
<e lm="tetanus"><i>tetanus</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="foolishness"><i>foolishness</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="midwife"><i>midwi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
<e lm="crewman"><i>crewm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="linesman"><i>linesm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="deafness"><i>deafness</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="ether"><i>ether</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
<e lm="sarcophagus"><i>sarcophagus</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
<e lm="astrophysics"><i>astrophysics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="superman"><i>superm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="completeness"><i>completeness</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="sonority"><i>sonorit</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="theorem"><i>theorem</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
<e lm="drachma"><i>drachma</i><par n="drachma__n"/></e>
<e lm="coachman"><i>coachm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="hamamelis"><i>hamamel</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
<e lm="biometrics"><i>biometrics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="erysipelas"><i>erysipelas</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
<e lm="miosis"><i>mios</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
<e lm="citriculture"><i>citriculture</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="solute"><i>solute</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
<e lm="theodicy"><i>theodic</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="photolysis"><i>photolys</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
<e lm="analytics"><i>analytics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="osteosynthesis"><i>osteosynthes</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
<e lm="trolleybus"><i>trolleybus</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
<e lm="uxorilocality"><i>uxorilocalit</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="ammonolysis"><i>ammonolys</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
<e lm="desulphurization"><i>desulphurization</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
<e lm="proteolysis"><i>proteolys</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
<e lm="gneiss"><i>gneiss</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
<e lm="acidimetry"><i>acidimetr</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
<e lm="maths"><i>maths</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
   <e>
        <par n="guionet"/>
      </e>
